Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Part 3

Tennessee Coal Surface Mining Law of 1980

59-8-301. State's power to acquire and reclaim land disturbed by past mining.

This state, acting by and through the department of environment and conservation, may acquire any property, by purchase, donation, or condemnation, which is adversely affected by past coal mining practices if the commissioner determines that acquisition of such land is necessary to successful reclamation and that:

The acquired land, after restoration, reclamation, abatement, control, or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices, will serve recreation and historic purposes, conservation and reclamation purposes or provide open space benefits; and

Permanent facilities such as treatment plant or a relocated stream channel will be constructed on the land for the restoration, reclamation, abatement, control, or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices; or

Acquisition of coal refuse disposal sites and all coal refuse thereon will serve the purposes of this part or that public ownership is desirable to meet emergency situations and prevent recurrences of the adverse effects of coal mining practices.

Prior to the acquisition of any property pursuant to this section, using exclusively state funds, the commissioner shall extend to the owners of the property an opportunity to regrade the area affected, correct drainage problems, plant vegetative cover, and do other acts of reclamation as required by the commissioner. If the owner or owners agree in writing to perform such reclamation and, weather permitting, start such reclamation within a period of sixty (60) days, and continue to completion, the property shall not be acquired by the state.

The commissioner shall attempt to purchase any property which the commissioner has determined should be acquired for the purpose of reclamation using exclusively state funds and which the owners have not agreed to reclaim as provided for in subsection (b). Where the commissioner and the owners of the property are unable to agree upon the amount to be paid for such property, the commissioner may exercise the power of eminent domain against such property.

The purchase price, in the case of a negotiated acquisition, or the damages as finally determined in the case of acquisition by condemnation, and the necessary expenses incidental thereto, shall be paid from the Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund, the federal abandoned mine reclamation fund with the approval of the secretary, or from appropriations made by the general assembly for such purposes.

The commissioner, or the commissioner's agents, employees, or contractors, shall have the right to enter upon any property for the purpose of conducting studies or exploratory work to determine the existence of adverse effects of past coal mining practices and to determine the feasibility of restoration, reclamation, abatement, control, or prevention of such adverse effects. Such entry shall be construed as an exercise of the police power for the protection of public health, safety, and general welfare, and shall not be construed as an act of condemnation of property nor trespass thereon.

If the commissioner makes a finding of fact that:

Land or water resources have been adversely affected by past coal mining practices; and

The adverse effects are at a stage where, in the public interest, action to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent should be taken; and

The owners of the land or water resources where entry must be made to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects of past coal mining practices are not known, or readily available; or

The owners will not give permission for the commissioner, the commissioner's agents, employees, or contractors to enter upon such property to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects of past coal mining practices;

then, upon giving notice by mail to the owners if known, or if not known, by posting notice upon the property and advertising once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the property lies, the state shall have the right to enter upon the property adversely affected by past coal mining practices, and any other property which is necessary for access to such property, to do all things necessary or expedient to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects. Such entry shall be construed as an exercise of the police power for the protection of public health, safety, and general welfare and shall not be construed as an act of condemnation of property nor of trespass thereon. The moneys expended for such work and the benefits accruing to any such property so entered upon shall be chargeable against such property, and shall mitigate or offset any claim or action brought by any owner of any interest in such property for any alleged damages by virtue of such entry; provided, however, that this provision is not intended to create new rights of action or eliminate existing immunities.

Title to all property acquired pursuant to this section shall be in the name of the state of Tennessee. The price paid for property acquired under this section shall reflect the market value of the property in its unreclaimed condition as adversely affected by past coal mining practices.

After the reclamation of the acquired property, the commissioner may, with the approval of the governor, where property has been reclaimed exclusively with state funds, or with the approval of the secretary, where funds from the federal abandoned mine reclamation fund have been used, transfer jurisdiction of such property or any portion thereof to any state or federal agency that can best utilize such property for public purposes. If the retention of any property is determined to be impractical, the commissioner may, with the approval of the governor and attorney general and reporter, where property has been reclaimed exclusively with state funds, or with the approval of the secretary, where funds from the federal abandoned mine reclamation fund have been used, sell such property at not less than fair market value to political subdivisions of the state or by public sale under a system of competitive bidding at not less than fair market value and under such other regulations promulgated to ensure that such lands are put to proper use consistent with local and state land use plans, if any. Such property shall be sold subject to the condition that no surface mining shall be conducted thereon at any time thereafter. The proceeds of any such sale shall be credited to the Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund provided for in § 59-8-212 if it has been reclaimed exclusively with state funds, or to the federal abandoned mine reclamation fund, if it has been reclaimed with funds from that source.

No property with respect to which a bond conditioned upon the reclamation thereof is in effect shall be acquired pursuant to this section, nor shall any provisions of this part be construed to relieve any person from any obligation to regrade, vegetate or perform other reclamation required by law.

All acquisitions and disposals of property or any interest therein pursuant to the authority granted by this part, shall be governed by the applicable provisions of title 12, chapters 1 and 2, where not inconsistent with the federal Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (30 U.S.C. §§ 1201-1328).

The commissioner, when requested after appropriate public notice, shall hold a public hearing in the county or counties in which property acquired pursuant to this section is located. The hearings shall be held at a time which shall afford local citizens and governments the maximum opportunity to participate in the decision concerning the use or disposition of the property after restoration, reclamation, abatement, control, or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices.

In addition to the authority to acquire property under this section, this state, and its political subdivisions, acting by and through the department, are authorized to accept property transferred by the secretary, if the secretary determines that such transfer is an integral and necessary element of an economically feasible plan for the project to construct or rehabilitate housing for persons disabled as the result of employment in the mines or work incidental thereto, persons displaced by acquisition of land pursuant to this section, or persons dislocated as the result of adverse effect of coal mining practices which constitute an emergency as provided in 30 U.S.C. § 1240, or persons dislocated as the result of natural disasters or catastrophic failures from any cause. Such activities shall be accomplished under such terms and conditions as the secretary shall require, which may include transfers of land with or without monetary consideration; provided, that, to the extent that the consideration is below the fair market value of the land transferred, no portion of the difference between the fair market value and the consideration shall accrue as a profit to such persons, firm, association, or corporation. No part of the funds provided under this part may be used to pay the actual construction costs of housing. The secretary may carry out the purposes of this subsection (l ) directly or the secretary may make grants and commitments for grants, and may advance money under such terms and conditions as the secretary may require to the state, or any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state, or any public body or nonprofit organization designated by the commissioner.

In the reclamation of property affected by surface coal mining, the commissioner may utilize any services which may be provided by other state or local agencies or by agencies of the federal government, and may compensate them for such services. The commissioner may also receive any federal funds, state funds, or any other funds for the reclamation of property affected by surface coal mining. The commissioner may cause the reclamation and revegetation work to be done by employees of the commissioner's own department or by employees of other governmental agencies or through contracts with qualified persons. Such contracts shall be awarded to the lowest and best bidder upon competitive bids after reasonable advertisement. The designees of the commissioner and any other agency and any contractor under a contract with the commissioner shall have the right of access to the property affected to carry out such reclamation. Any funds available to the commissioner and any public works program may be used and expended to reclaim any property that has been subjected to surface mining that has not been reclaimed in accordance with standards set by this part or regulations thereunder and which are not covered by bond to guarantee such reclamation.

Acts 1980, ch. 908, § 24; 1984, ch. 837, § 3; T.C.A. §59-8-324.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-8-324 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§59-8-301 —59-8-320 (Acts 1980, ch. 908, §§ 1-20; 1981, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 131, §§ 39-42; 1981, ch. 169, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 280, §§ 1-7, 10; 1983, ch. 121, § 1; 1983, ch. 204, §§ 1, 2), concerning coal surface mining, were repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 1. For the Coal Surface Mining Act of 1987, see title 59, ch. 8, part 4.

Cross-References. Eminent domain, title 29, ch. 16.

59-8-302. Liens.

Whenever the commissioner begins to expend money on a project to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent adverse effects of past coal mining practices on privately owned property under § 59-8-301(f), the commissioner may file a notice with the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the property lies.

Within six (6) months after the completion of projects to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent adverse effects of past coal mining practices on privately owned property under § 59-8-301(f), the commissioner shall itemize the moneys so expended and shall file a statement thereof in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the property lies, together with notarized appraisals by an independent appraiser of the value of the property before and after the restoration, reclamation, abatement, control, or prevention of adverse effects of past coal mining practices, if the moneys so expended shall result in a significant increase in property value. Such statement shall constitute a lien upon such land. The lien shall not exceed the amount determined by the appraisal to be the increase in the market value of the property as a result of the restoration, reclamation, abatement, control, or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices. No lien shall be filed against the property of any person, in accordance with this subsection (b), who owned the surface prior to May 2, 1977, and who neither consented to nor participated in, nor exercised control over, the mining operation which necessitated the reclamation performed hereunder.

In the year following the year in which the lien is filed in the designated county office and for each year thereafter until the lien is fully satisfied, the designees of the commissioner shall calculate an annual interest charge of five percent (5%) against the outstanding value of each lien, and shall maintain a record of the charges owing against such lien which shall be made available to the property owner upon request. This interest charge may be allowed to accrue but must be paid in full before the lien shall be considered fully satisfied and shall be released.

The property owner may proceed as provided by law to petition within sixty (60) days of the filing of the lien, to determine the increase in the market value of the property as a result of the restoration, reclamation, abatement, control, or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices. The amount appraised to be the increase in value of the property shall constitute the amount of the lien, and shall be recorded with the statement herein provided. Any party aggrieved by the decision may appeal as provided by state law.

The lien provided in this section shall be entered in the records of the register of deeds of the county in which the property lies. Such statements shall constitute a lien upon such property as of the date notice is filed pursuant to subsection (a), and shall have priority from the day of such filing of notice, but shall not affect, or have priority over, any valid lien, right, or interest in the property duly recorded, or duly perfected by filing, prior to the filing of the notice and shall not have priority over any real estate tax liens, whether attaching on the property before or after the filing of the notice. A lien on private property, and the accrued interest charges placed thereon, shall be satisfied to the extent of the value of the consideration received at the time of transfer of ownership, any other statute to the contrary notwithstanding.

A form of notice substantially as follows is sufficient to comply with subsection (a):

NOTICE OF LIEN UNDER TENNESSEE COAL SURFACE MINING LAW OF 1980

Name of titleholder(s)

Property address

Description of property subject to possible lien sufficient to identify such property

Date, signature, and address of the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized designee

The register of deeds shall note the date and time of filing, and an appropriate registration number, and shall record the notice in the lien book in the office of the register.

The effective date of all prior liens claimed under this chapter shall be unaffected by the 1986 amendment to this section if a notice is filed in accordance with subsection (a) on or before December 31, 1986, which notice shall set forth, in addition to the information required by subsection (e), the claimed effective date of the lien if earlier than the date of the filing of the notice. After December 31, 1986, all claimed liens shall be effective as of the date the notice is filed pursuant to subsection (a).

Acts 1980, ch. 908, § 25; 1983, ch. 147, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 837, § 4; 1986, ch. 529, § 1; 1988, ch. 549, § 1; T.C.A. §59-8-325.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-8-325 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Compiler's Notes. The 1986 amendment to this section, referred to in subsection (f), added (a), (e), and (f) and amended (d).

Former §§59-8-301 —59-8-320 (Acts 1980, ch. 908, §§ 1-20; 1981, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 131, §§ 39-42; 1981, ch. 169, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 280, §§ 1-7, 10; 1983, ch. 121, § 1; 1983, ch. 204, §§ 1, 2), concerning coal surface mining, were repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 1. For the Coal Surface Mining Act of 1987, see title 59, ch. 8, part 4.

Cross-References. Recording and enforcement of liens, §§66-21-101 —66-21-104,66-21-106 —66-21-107,66-21-109, title 66, ch. 21, part 2.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

59-8-303. Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund.

All sums received through the payment of permit and acreage fees, fines, penalties, or the forfeiture of bonds, shall be placed in the state treasury and credited to a special agency account to be designated as the Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund.

This fund, appropriations for which are also authorized, shall be available to the commissioner for expenditure for reclamation and revegetation of land and water affected by mining and exploration operations both on and off site and related research, including areas so affected prior to May 2, 1980.

Any unencumbered and any unexpended balance of this fund remaining at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund, but shall be carried forward until expended for the purpose of research, reclamation, and revegetation of land and water affected by mining and exploration operations as provided in this section.

Any portion of the fund which represents permit and acreage fees and interest thereon shall be transferred to the department for administration and enforcement of this part. All such revenue and any interest thereon which is unexpended or unobligated at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall be carried forward in a reserve to remain available for expenditure by the department for such administration and enforcement. Such reserve shall not be subject to allotment impoundment and shall be maintained on a no quarter basis. Such reserve may also be expended by the department to develop a program to obtain primacy for the regulation and enforcement of surface mining activities pursuant to the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (30 U.S.C. §§ 1201 — 1328).

Acts 1980, ch. 908, § 26; 1984, ch. 837, § 5; 1987, ch. 251, § 2; T.C.A. §59-8-326.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-8-326 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§59-8-301 —59-8-320 (Acts 1980, ch. 908, §§ 1-20; 1981, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 131, §§ 39-42; 1981, ch. 169, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 280, §§ 1-7, 10; 1983, ch. 121, § 1; 1983, ch. 204, §§ 1, 2), concerning coal surface mining, were repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 1. For the Coal Surface Mining Act of 1987, see title 59, ch. 8, part 4.

59-8-304. Definitions for §§ 59-8-304 — 59-8-309. [See contingent amendment to subdivision (1) and the Compiler’s Notes.]

As used in §§59-8-304 —59-8-309, unless the context otherwise requires:

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler's Notes.]

“Board” means the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas [See the Compiler's Notes] as created by [former] § 59-8-321 [repealed. See Compiler's Notes];

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler's Notes.]

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of environment and conservation, the commissioner of environment and conservation's duly authorized representatives, and in the event of absence or a vacancy in the office of commissioner, the deputy commissioner;

“Department” means the department of environment and conservation; and

“Director” means the director of the division of water pollution control in the department of environment and conservation.

“Board” means the Tennessee board of energy and natural resources created by §69-3-104;

Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 6; 1987, ch. 251, § 3; 1992, ch. 693, § 1; T.C.A §59-8-351; Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 6.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-8-351 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former §59-8-321, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 2(b). The duties of the former board of reclamation review were transferred to the former water quality control board created by §69-3-104, by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 4. The former water quality control board, created by § 69-3-104, was terminated by Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 26, and its responsibilities were transferred to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by § 69-3-104.

Former §§59-8-301 —59-8-320 (Acts 1980, ch. 908, §§ 1-20; 1981, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 131, §§ 39-42; 1981, ch. 169, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 280, §§ 1-7, 10; 1983, ch. 121, § 1; 1983, ch. 204, §§ 1, 2), concerning coal surface mining, were repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 1. For the Coal Surface Mining Act of 1987, see title 59, ch. 8, part 4.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the definition of “board” by substituting “board of energy and natural resources, created by §69-3-104” for “board of water quality, oil, and gas as established pursuant to former §59-8-321”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-305. Violations — Penalties.

Any person who willfully and knowingly does any of the following acts is guilty of a Class E felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000):

Mines more than twenty-five (25) tons of coal within twelve (12) successive calendar months, regardless of the size of the mine site, without obtaining a permit for such mine from the commissioner or the primary regulatory authority pursuant to 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq., or without a permit for such mine obtained pursuant to this part prior to October 1, 1984;

Knowingly and willfully violates this chapter, or the rules and regulations or orders of the commissioner, or knowingly falsifies an application for a permit; or

Prevents or impedes an employee of the state from performing the employee's duty under this part, except as permitted by law.

Whenever a corporation commits the acts described in this section, the director, officer or agent of such corporation who willfully and knowingly authorized, ordered or carried out such violation, failure or refusal shall be subject to the same fines and imprisonment that may be imposed under this section.

All penalties and fines recovered under this section shall be placed in the state treasury and credited to the Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund.

Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 6; 1987, ch. 251, § 4; 1989, ch. 591, § 77; T.C.A. §59-8-352.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-8-352 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§59-8-301 —59-8-320 (Acts 1980, ch. 908, §§ 1-20; 1981, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 131, §§ 39-42; 1981, ch. 169, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 280, §§ 1-7, 10; 1983, ch. 121, § 1; 1983, ch. 204, §§ 1, 2), concerning coal surface mining, were repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 1. For the Coal Surface Mining Act of 1987, see title 59, ch. 8, part 4.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Surface mine reclamation fund, §59-8-326.

59-8-306. Applicability of prior law.

Any person who obtained a permit from the state for coal surface mining prior to May 3, 1978, and whose bond had not been released in full, shall be subject to all requirements regarding the performance standards, permit, bonding and reclamation in existence as of the date such permit was issued, which laws and regulations shall remain in full force and effect solely for the purpose of state regulation of such sites.

Any person who obtained a permit from the state for coal surface mining prior to September 30, 1984, but after May 3, 1978, and upon whom bond forfeiture has been commenced by the department prior to October 1, 1984, shall be subject to all requirements regarding performance standards, permit, bonding and reclamation in existence as of the date such permit was issued, which laws and regulations shall remain in full force and effect for such purpose until the bond is collected or released. This subsection (b) shall be null and void if the secretary of the interior assumes any jurisdiction over such bond forfeitures.

All penalty provisions and enforcement and administrative powers and duties in existence as of the date such permits were issued shall remain in force and effect for the administration and enforcement of subsections (a) and (b) by the commissioner and the department. All administrative review and judicial review for the purposes of this section shall be in accordance with [former] §§ 59-8-321 [repealed. See the Compiler's Notes] and [former] 59-8-322 [repealed. See the Compiler's Notes].

Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 6; T.C.A. §59-8-353.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-8-353 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§59-8-321 and59-8-322, referred to in this section, concerning the former board of reclamation review, were repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 2(b). The duties of the former board of reclamation review were transferred to the former water quality control board created by §69-3-104, by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 4. The former water quality control board, created by § 69-3-104, was terminated by Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 26, and its responsibilities were transferred to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by § 69-3-104.

Former §§59-8-301 —59-8-320 (Acts 1980, ch. 908, §§ 1-20; 1981, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 131, §§ 39-42; 1981, ch. 169, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 280, §§ 1-7, 10; 1983, ch. 121, § 1; 1983, ch. 204, §§ 1, 2), concerning coal surface mining, were repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 1. For the Coal Surface Mining Act of 1987, see title 59, ch. 8, part 4.

59-8-307. When permits required.

Any person who mines more than twenty-five (25) tons of coal within twelve (12) successive calendar months in this state, regardless of the size of the mine site, must obtain a permit for such mine from the commissioner or the primary regulatory authority.

Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 6; 1987, ch. 251, § 5; T.C.A. §59-8-354.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-8-354 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§59-8-301 —59-8-320 (Acts 1980, ch. 908, §§ 1-20; 1981, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 131, §§ 39-42; 1981, ch. 169, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 280, §§ 1-7, 10; 1983, ch. 121, § 1; 1983, ch. 204, §§ 1, 2), concerning coal surface mining, were repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 1. For the Coal Surface Mining Act of 1987, see title 59, ch. 8, part 4.

59-8-308. Commissioner and personnel — Powers.

The commissioner shall have the authority to:

Employ and commission qualified persons as surface mine reclamation personnel. When properly qualified and commissioned, such personnel shall be vested with such authority as is necessary to enforce all laws, regulations, permits, and orders administered by the department, including the issuance of service of process and shall have the right to carry firearms or other arms while on duty;

Make such investigations or inspections as are necessary to ensure compliance with any provisions of §§ 59-8-304 — 59-8-309, including the right to enter at any time upon a suspected or affected area for such purposes and the right of ingress and egress across intervening properties.

Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 8; T.C.A. §59-8-355.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-8-355 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§59-8-301 —59-8-320 (Acts 1980, ch. 908, §§ 1-20; 1981, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 131, §§ 39-42; 1981, ch. 169, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 280, §§ 1-7, 10; 1983, ch. 121, § 1; 1983, ch. 204, §§ 1, 2), concerning coal surface mining, were repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 1. For the Coal Surface Mining Act of 1987, see title 59, ch. 8, part 4.

59-8-309. Rules and regulations.

All rules and regulations promulgated and now in force for the abandoned mine land reclamation program, published by the secretary of state as chapter 0400-1-24 shall remain in full force and effect. All other rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part, except as otherwise provided in §§59-8-304 —59-8-309, are repealed.

Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 7; T.C.A. §59-8-356.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-8-356 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§59-8-301 —59-8-320 (Acts 1980, ch. 908, §§ 1-20; 1981, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 131, §§ 39-42; 1981, ch. 169, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 280, §§ 1-7, 10; 1983, ch. 121, § 1; 1983, ch. 204, §§ 1, 2), concerning coal surface mining, were repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 837, § 1. For the Coal Surface Mining Act of 1987, see title 59, ch. 8, part 4.